Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 2

County Community Work Projects for Probationers

41-9-201. County community work project coordinator.

In all counties of the state, the board or other governmental entity having charge of, supervision, and control of the county workhouse is authorized to employ or assign a person for the position of county community work project coordinator. Any person so employed or assigned shall be responsible for administering a community work project program for probationers placed under the jurisdiction of the county. The county legislative body shall approve the community work project program before the program is implemented.

The county community work project coordinator shall be compensated as other county employees and shall be supervised by the director of probation for the county.

The duties of the county community work project coordinator shall include, but are not limited to:

Preparing, receiving and reviewing applications from qualified organizations and entities for projects within the county that may be performed by county probationer labor;

Interviewing and screening the county probationers available for community work projects in order to match their particular job skills with the type of labor needed;

Coordinating the various approved work projects to ensure that the county probationers available are being utilized efficiently and to the best of their abilities;

Regularly inspecting each approved work project to ensure that the county probationers are being properly supervised, that they do not pose a threat to members of the community in the area in which they are working and that they are being utilized to perform the type of work for which they were requested; and

Performing such other duties as may be assigned by the board or other governmental entity having charge of, supervision and control of the county workhouse.

Acts 1986, ch. 742, § 1.

Cross-References. Community work projects for probationers and parolees, title 41, ch. 9, part 1.

Probation, paroles and pardons, title 40, ch. 28.

41-9-202. Applications for probationer labor.

Any charitable organization or governmental entity within the county is eligible to apply with the county community work project coordinator of the county for county probationer labor to perform a specific work project for the organization or entity.

The application forms shall be prepared by the work project coordinator of each county but shall contain the following information:

The charitable organization or governmental entity for whom the work will be performed;

The specific work project for which county probationer labor is requested;

The specific job skills, if any, that will be required to complete the project;

The number of county probationers requested for the project;

The anticipated period of time the work project will take to complete; and

The person in the organization or entity that will be responsible for the supervision and care of any county probationer working on the project.

When the work project application forms have been prepared, any charitable organization exempt from taxation pursuant to § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), or any agency, branch, department or other entity of municipal, county or state government may submit an application for county probationer labor to the county community work project coordinator of the county in which the work project is to be performed.

The county community work project coordinator shall review each application so submitted and first determine whether the organization or entity is eligible for county probationer labor under subsection (c). If the coordinator determines it is not, the application shall be rejected. If the coordinator determines that the application is from an eligible organization or entity, the coordinator may approve it or reject it. If it is rejected, the coordinator shall state the reasons for the rejection in writing and send a copy to the applicant. The coordinator may also approve an application subject to certain modifications the coordinator deems necessary. If of the opinion that a work project should be modified as to certain particulars, the coordinator shall send a copy of the proposed modifications to the applicant. If the applicant agrees to the modifications, the coordinator may approve the application as modified. If the coordinator and applicant cannot agree as to some or all of the modifications, the coordinator may approve the application as originally filed, may approve the application subject to the agreed upon modifications or may reject the application.

The decision of a county community work project coordinator as to whether an organization or entity is eligible for a work project and as to whether the application should be approved or rejected shall be final and shall not be subject to review by appeal except in cases of abuse of discretion. The director of probation of the county has authority over the appeals.

Acts 1986, ch. 742, § 1.

Cross-References. Probation, paroles and pardons, title 40, ch. 28.

41-9-203. Probationers — Eligibility — Reporting to work — Violations.

Work projects approved pursuant to this part shall be performed by defendants who have been placed on probation pursuant to § 40-35-303, who, as a condition of probation, have been ordered to perform a period of community service work as provided in § 40-35-303(d)(3), and who have been assigned to the supervision of the county.

When a judge so places a defendant on probation and orders the defendant to perform community service work, the judge shall direct the defendant to report to the county community work project coordinator in the county in which the defendant resides or where the offense occurred. The coordinator shall interview the defendant for the purpose of determining job skills and the work project for which the defendant is best suited. Failure of a defendant to report to the work project coordinator when directed to do so by a judge shall constitute a violation of the defendant's probation and shall be reported by the coordinator to the defendant's probation officer.

After interviewing a defendant and determining the work project to which the defendant is best suited, the coordinator shall give the defendant a date and time to report, the location of the work project and the name of the person responsible for supervising the work project. The defendant shall be responsible for reporting to the project supervisor at the designated date and time. Prior to that date and time, the coordinator shall notify the project supervisor of the name of the defendant, the defendant's job skills and the date and time the defendant is to report to work. If the defendant does not appear for work at the designated date and time, the project supervisor shall so notify the coordinator. Failure of a defendant to appear at a work project when directed to do so by the coordinator shall constitute a violation of the defendant's probation and shall be reported by the coordinator to the defendant's probation officer.

If any defendant placed on probation and ordered to perform community service work pursuant to § 40-35-303 is employed or is seeking employment, the work project coordinator shall assign the defendant to a work project that can be performed during times that do not interfere with the defendant's employment or seeking of employment.

Acts 1986, ch. 742, § 1.

Cross-References. Probation, paroles and pardons, title 40, ch. 28.

41-9-204. Liability for injury or damages.

No charitable organization, municipality, county or political subdivision thereof authorized by § 41-9-102 to utilize probationer labor pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for any injury sustained by a probationer or other person while the probationer is performing a work project for that organization or governmental entity, if the organization or governmental entity exercised due care in the protection and supervision of the probationer.

No municipality, county or political subdivision thereof, nor any employee or officer thereof, shall be liable to any person for the acts of any probationer while the probationer is on a community work project for the organization or governmental entity, if the organization or governmental entity exercised due care in the protection and supervision of the probationer.

No municipality, county or political subdivision thereof, nor any employee or officer thereof, shall be liable to any probationer or a probationer's family for death or injuries received while the probationer is on a community work project for the organization or governmental entity, if the organization or governmental entity exercised due care in the protection and supervision of the probationer.

Acts 1986, ch. 742, § 1.